Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Modification or Vacation after Term
§ 1-16-409.
Applicability of provisions to supreme court.

The provisions relating
to modification or vacation of judgments or orders apply to the supreme
court so far as the same are applicable to its judgments or final
orders.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 372; R.S. 1887, § 2712; R.S. 1899, § 3806; C.S. 1910, § 4661; C.S. 1920, § 5934; R.S. 1931, § 89-2312; C.S. 1945, § 3-3812; W.S. 1957, § 1-334; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-17-409.

Where petition in error was dismissed because no judgment was shown in transcript,

supreme court will not vacate the order at the second term, though a new transcript was filed showing formal judgment. Gramm v. Fisher, 4 Wyo. 1, 31 P. 767,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1892).